District of Columbia statutes.
9-631

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Block party” means an activity of a recreational or civic nature sponsored by the residents of a neighborhood, for which the residents seek to close a block of a street in their neighborhood and for which there is no admission or entrance fee.

(2)

“Department” means the District Department of Transportation.

Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-190, § 2, 59 DCR 10163
This section is referenced in § 47-2862.